GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-regions.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     region names and demonyms
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# AUTHOR:      C. Hagege, UCM (from italian corresponding file) é 
!# CREATED:	23-May-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================
!# sources:
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Prop +Adj 
+Nationality

+Region
+State
+Island
+Desert
+Mountain
+Water

+Sg +Pl	+SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron +Abrev


!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT 
Asturias+Prop+Region		FPL;
Canarias+Prop+Region		FPL;
Cataluña+Prop+Region		FSG;
Galicia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Navarra+Prop+Region		FSG;
Madrid+Prop+Region		FSG;
Valencia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Baleares+Prop+Region		MPL;
Castilla% %-% León+Prop+Region	FSG;
Illes% Balears+Prop+Region	FPL;
Islas% Balears+Prop+Region	FPL;
Abjasia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Amazonas+Prop+Region		FSG;
América% del% Norte+Prop+Region	FSG;
América% Latina+Prop+Region	FSG;
Bretaña+Prop+Region		FSG;
Castilla% la% Vieja+Prop+Region	FSG;
Dalmacia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Haute-Garonne+Prop+Region	MSG;
Haute-Vienne+Prop+Region	MSG;
Hispanoamérica+Prop+Region	FSG;
Kosovo+Prop+Region		MSG;
Las% Américas+Prop+Region	FPL;
Las% Antillas+Prop+Region	FPL;
Lombardía+Prop+Region		FSG;
Normandie+Prop+Region		FSG;
Norteamérica+Prop+Region	FSG;
Palestina+Prop+Region		FSG;
Piamonte+Prop+Region		MSG;
Pirineos+Prop+Region		MPL;
Sajonia+Prop+Region		FSG;
Sudamérica+Prop+Region		FSG;
Toscana+Prop+Region		FSG;
Zelanda+Prop+Region		FSG;
Pernambuco+Prop+State		MSG;
Coahuila+Prop+State		MSG;
Guerrero+Prop+State		MSG;
Michoacán+Prop+State		MSG;
Nuevo% León+Prop+State		MSG;
Sinaloa+Prop+State		MSG;
Tlaxcala+Prop+State		MSG;
Quintana% Roo+Prop+State	MSG;
Alaska+Prop+State+Abrev:AK		XSP;
Alaska+Prop+State			XSP;
Arizona+Prop+State+Abrev:AZ		XSP;
Arizona+Prop+State			XSP;
Arkansas+Prop+State+Abrev:AR		XSP;
Arkansas+Prop+State			XSP;
Baja% California+Prop+State		XSP;
Baja% California% Sur+Prop+State	XSP;
California+Prop+State+Abrev:CA		XSP;
California+Prop+State			XSP;
Carolina% del% Norte+Prop+State		XSP;
Carolina% del% Sur+Prop+State		XSP;
Colorado+Prop+State+Abrev:CO		XSP;
Colorado+Prop+State			XSP;
Connecticut+Prop+State+Abrev:CT		XSP;
Connecticut+Prop+State			XSP;
Dakota% del% Norte+Prop+State		XSP;
Dakota% del% Sur+Prop+State		XSP;
Delaware+Prop+State			XSP;
District% of% Columbia+Prop+State+Abrev:DC	XSP;
District% of% Columbia+Prop+State	XSP;
Distrito% de% Columbia+Prop+State	XSP;
Distrito% Federal+Prop+State		XSP;
Florida+Prop+State+Abrev:FL		XSP;
Florida+Prop+State			XSP;
Georgia+Prop+State+Abrev:GA		XSP;
Georgia+Prop+State			XSP;
Hawaii+Prop+State+Abrev:HW		XSP;
Hawaii+Prop+State			XSP;
Idaho+Prop+State+Abrev:ID		XSP;
Idaho+Prop+State			XSP;
Illinois+Prop+State+Abrev:IL		XSP;
Illinois+Prop+State			XSP;
Indiana+Prop+State+Abrev:IN		XSP;
Indiana+Prop+State			XSP;
Iowa+Prop+State+Abrev:IA		XSP;
Iowa+Prop+State				XSP;
Kansas+Prop+State+Abrev:KS		XSP;
Kansas+Prop+State			XSP;
Kentucky+Prop+State+Abrev:KY		XSP;
Kentucky+Prop+State			XSP;
Louisiana+Prop+State			XSP;
Maine+Prop+State			XSP;
Maryland+Prop+State			XSP;
Massachusetts+Prop+State		XSP;
Michigan+Prop+State			XSP;
Minnesota+Prop+State			XSP;
Mississippi+Prop+State			XSP;
Missouri+Prop+State			XSP;
Montana+Prop+State			XSP;
Nebraska+Prop+State			XSP;
Nevada+Prop+State			XSP;
New% Hampshire+Prop+State		XSP;
New% Jersey+Prop+State			XSP;
New% Mexico+Prop+State			XSP;
New% York+Prop+State			XSP;
North% Carolina+Prop+State		XSP;
North% Dakota+Prop+State		XSP;
Nueva% York+Prop+State			XSP;
Ohio+Prop+State+Abrev:OH		XSP;
Oklahoma+Prop+State+Abrev:OK		XSP;
Oregon+Prop+State+Abrev:OR		XSP;
Pennsylvania+Prop+State+Abrev:PA	XSP;
Quintana% Roo+Prop+State			XSP;
Rhode% Island+Prop+State		XSP;
South% Carolina+Prop+State+Abrev:SC	XSP;
South% Dakota+Prop+State+Abrev:SD	XSP;
Tennessee+Prop+State+Abrev:TN		XSP;
Texas+Prop+State+Abrev:TX		XSP;
Utah+Prop+State+Abrev:UT		XSP;
Vermont+Prop+State+Abrev:VT		XSP;
Virginia% Occidental+Prop+State		XSP;
Virginia+Prop+State			XSP;
Washington+Prop+State			XSP;
West% Virginia+Prop+State		XSP;
Wisconsin+Prop+State			XSP;
Wyoming+Prop+State			XSP;
Alegranza+Prop+Island		FSG;
Alhucemas+Prop+Island		FPL;
Andros+Prop+Island		FSG;
Baleares+Prop+Island		FPL;
Bali+Prop+Island		FSG;
Bartolomé+Prop+Island		FSG;
Bermuda+Prop+Island		FSG;
Boracay+Prop+Island		FSG;
Cabrera+Prop+Island		FSG;
Canarias+Prop+Island		FPL;
Cat+Prop+Island			FSG;
Celebes+Prop+Island		FSG;
Chafarinas+Prop+Island		FPL;
Coelleira+Prop+Island		FSG;
Cortegada+Prop+Island		FSG;
Creta+Prop+Island		FSG;
Crooked+Prop+Island		FSG;
Curieuse+Prop+Island		FSG;
Cíes+Prop+Island		FPL;
Córcega+Prop+Island		FSG;
Delos+Prop+Island		FSG;
Djenné+Prop+Island		FSG;
Djerba+Prop+Island		FSG;
El% Hierro+Prop+Island		FSG;
Escombreras+Prop+Island		FSG;
Exumas+Prop+Island		FSG;
Fiji+Prop+Island		FSG;
Folegandros+Prop+Island		FSG;
Freeport+Prop+Island		FSG;
Genovesa+Prop+Island		FSG;
Graciosa+Prop+Island		FSG;
Gran% Bahama+Prop+Island	FSG;
Gran% Canaria+Prop+Island	FSG;
Hawái+Prop+Island		FSG;
Hvar+Prop+Island		FSG;
Ios+Prop+Island			FSG;
Isla% Isabela+Prop+Island	FSG;
Isla% Verde+Prop+Island		FSG;
Isla% de% Cabo% Verde+Prop+Island	FSG;
Isla% de% Toas+Prop+Island	FSG;
Islas% de% Rosario+Prop+Island	FPL;
Islas% de% la% Bahía+Prop+Island	FPL;
Islona+Prop+Island		FSG;
Kea+Prop+Island			FSG;
La% Digue+Prop+Island		FSG;
La% Palma+Prop+Island		FSG;
Likoma+Prop+Island		FSG;
Mallorca+Prop+Island		FSG;
Malvinas+Prop+Island		FPL;
Maui+Prop+Island		FSG;
Mfangano+Prop+Island		FSG;
Mouro+Prop+Island			FSG;
Ngamba+Prop+Island		FSG;
Olkhon+Prop+Island		FSG;
Penang+Prop+Island		FSG;
Pinta+Prop+Island		FSG;
Ratones+Prop+Island		FSG;
Santorini+Prop+Island		FSG;
Scheneylles+Prop+Island		FPL;
Seymour% Norte+Prop+Island	FSG;
Silhouette+Prop+Island		FSG;
Tahiti+Prop+Island		FSG;
Terceira+Prop+Island		FSG;
Zakynthos+Prop+Island		FSG;
Arábigo+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Dasht-e% Lut+Prop+Desert	MSG;
Gobi+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Kavir+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Mojave+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Pequeño% Desierto% Arenoso+Prop+Desert	MSG;
Sechura+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Strzelecki+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Tanami+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Tirari+Prop+Desert		MSG;
Pirineos+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Adi+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Alberes+Prop+Mountain			MPL;
Alcazaba+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Arabedes+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Balaitus+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Bigüenzo+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Calvitero+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Carrío+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Chinyero+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Colomers+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Cornón+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Cotillar+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Endino+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Espuña+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Gándara+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Hindukush+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Javalambre+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
Lunada+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Margalida+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Matamigüela+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
Mont-Blanc+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
Montehano+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Montvallier+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
Navajos+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Ori+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Peñagolosa+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
Perdiguero+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
Rocigalgo+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Sobrecomillas+Prop+Mountain		MSG;
Tiñones+Prop+Mountain			MSG;
Alagón+Prop+Water		MSG;
Arbas+Prop+Water		MSG;
Azopardo+Prop+Water		MSG;
Bullaque+Prop+Water		MSG;
Cidacos+Prop+Water		MSG;
Chira+Prop+Water		MSG;
Drava+Prop+Water		MSG;
Ems+Prop+Water			MSG;
Fluviá+Prop+Water		MSG;
Glan+Prop+Water			MSG; 
Guadalete+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Guadalquivir+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Guaíba+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Huerva+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Itata+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Júcar+Prop+Water		MSG;  
Mackenzie+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Mindel+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Nájima+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Oja+Prop+Water			MSG; 
Porma+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Riaza+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Saona+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Támega+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Tormes+Prop+Water		MSG; 
Vils+Prop+Water			MSG; 
Albanés+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
Alemán+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
andorrano+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
austriaco+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
belga+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
bielorruso+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
búlgaro+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
chipriota+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
croata+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
danés+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
eslovaco+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
esloveno+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
español+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
finés+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
francés+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
griego+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
húngaro+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
irlandés+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
inglés+Adj+Nationality		MFSGPL;
italiano+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
portugués+Adj+Nationality	MFSGPL;
albanokosovar+Adj+Nationality	XSGPL;	!from lex-modify.xfst
kosovar+Adj+Nationality		XSGPL;	!from lex-modify.xfst
